Missouri, session 2026, HB2258.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.782, 67.783, 67.785, 144.030, 144.615, 313.055, and 313.057,
RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
67.782, 67.783, 67.785, 144.030, 144.615, and 313.057, to read as follows:
67.782. 1. The governing body of the following counties may impose a tax as
provided in this section:
(1) Any county [of the third class having a population of] with more than [ten
thousand and less than fifteen thousand and] nine thousand nine hundred but fewer than
eleven thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than one thousand but
fewer than one thousand five hundred inhabitants; or
(2) Any county [of the second class having a population of] with more than [fifty-
eight thousand and less than seventy thousand adjacent to such third class county, both
counties making up the same judicial circuit,] eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than thirteen thousand but
fewer than seventeen thousand inhabitants.
2. The governing body of any county listed in subsection 1 of this section may
[jointly] impose a sales tax [throughout each of their respective counties] for public
recreational purposes including the financing, acquisition, construction, operation, and
maintenance of recreational projects and programs, but the sales taxes authorized by this
section shall not become effective unless the governing body of [each] such county submits to
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2258 2
the voters [of their respective counties] a proposal to authorize [the counties to impose] the
sales tax.
[2.] 3. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the County of ______ impose a sales tax of ______ percent [in
conjunction with the county of ______] for the purpose of funding the
financing, acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance of
recreational projects and programs, including the acquisition of land
for such purposes?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a [separate] majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon
[in each county] are in favor of the proposal, [then] the tax shall be in effect [in both
counties]. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting thereon [in either
county] are opposed to the proposal, [then] the governing body of [neither] the county shall
not have power to impose the sales tax [authorized by this section] unless or until the
[governing body of the county that has not approved the tax shall] proposal is again [have]
submitted [another proposal to authorize the governing body to impose the tax,] and the
proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon in that county.
[3.] 4. The sales tax may be imposed at a rate of one percent on the receipts from the
sale at retail of all tangible personal property or taxable service at retail within the county
adopting such tax, if such property and services are subject to taxation by the state of
Missouri under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525.
[4.] 5. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue under this section on behalf
of any county, less one percent for the cost of collection, which shall be deposited in the
state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in
section 32.087, shall be deposited with the state treasurer in a special trust fund, which is
hereby created, to be known as the "County Recreation Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys
in the county recreation sales tax trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not
be commingled with any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate
records of the amount of money in the trust fund which was collected in each county
imposing a sales tax under this section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of
officers of each county and the general public. Not later than the tenth day of each month, the
director of revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding
month by distributing to the county treasurer, or such other officer as may be designated by
the county ordinance or order, of each county imposing the tax authorized by this section, the
sum, as certified by the director of revenue, due the county.

HB 2258 3
[5.] 6. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from
the amounts in the trust fund and credited to any county for erroneous payments and
overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such counties. Each county shall notify the director of revenue at least ninety days prior to
the effective date of the expiration of the sales tax authorized by this section and the director
of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the
amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of
such tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
After one year has elapsed after the date of expiration of the tax authorized by this section in
such county, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the county and
close the account of that county. The director of revenue shall notify each county of each
instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
[6.] 7. The tax authorized by this section may be imposed, in accordance with this
section, by a county in addition to or in lieu of the tax authorized by sections 67.750 to
67.780.
[7.] 8. Any county imposing a sales tax pursuant to the provisions of this section may
contract with the authority of any other county or with any city or political subdivision for the
financing, acquisition, operation, construction, maintenance, or utilization of any recreation
facility or project or program funded in whole or in part from revenues derived from the tax
levied pursuant to the provisions of this section.
[8.] 9. The sales tax imposed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall expire
twenty-five years from the effective date thereof unless an extension of the tax is submitted to
and approved by the voters in each county in the manner provided in this section. Each
extension of the sales tax shall be for a period of ten years.
[9.] 10. The governing body of each of the counties imposing a sales tax under the
provisions of this section may cooperate with the governing body of any county or other
political subdivision of this state in carrying out the provisions of this section, and may
establish and conduct jointly a system of public recreation. The respective governing bodies
administering programs jointly may provide by agreement among themselves for all matters
connected with the programs and determine what items of cost and expense shall be paid by
each.
[10.] 11. The provisions of this section shall not in any way repeal, affect,or limit the
powers granted to any county to establish, maintain, and conduct parks and other recreational
grounds for public recreation.
[11.] 12. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and
32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.

HB 2258 4
67.783. 1. There is hereby created within [any county of the third class having a
population of more than ten thousand and less than fifteen thousand and any county of the
second class having a population of more than fifty-eight thousand and less than seventy
thousand adjacent to such third class county, both counties making up the same judicial
circuit,] the counties described under subsection 1 of section 67.782 a joint county
recreational lake authority, which shall be a body corporate and politic and a political
subdivision of this state.
2. Subject to the limitations in section 67.788, the authority may exercise its powers
over the reservoir area encompassing any recreational lake and within five thousand feet of
the conservation storage level of any recreational lake constructed or to be constructed by the
authority pursuant to sections 67.781 to 67.790.
3. It shall be the purpose of each authority to promote the general welfare, to promote
recreation and to encourage private capital investment through the construction, operation,
and maintenance of a recreational lake and related improvements to be located [jointly in the
second class county and the third class county] in the counties described under subsection
1 of section 67.782.
4. The income of the authority and all property at any time owned by the authority
shall be exempt from all taxation or any assessments whatsoever to the state or of any
political subdivision, municipality, or other governmental agency thereof.
5. No county in which an authority is organized shall be held liable in connection
with the construction, operation, or maintenance of any project or program undertaken
pursuant to sections 67.781 to 67.790, including any actions taken by the authority in
connection with any project or program undertaken pursuant to sections 67.781 to 67.790.
67.785. 1. The authority shall consist of nine members, appointed or elected as
follows:
(1) Within thirty days after approval by the voters of the sales tax authorized in
section 67.782, the county commission of [the second class] a county described under
subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section 67.782 shall initially appoint six members to the
authority, with the terms of members staggered such that the terms of two members [each
expiring on December 31, 1992, December 31, 1994, and December 31, 1996] expire on
December thirty-first of each even-numbered year. The county commission of [the third
class] a county described under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 67.782 shall
initially appoint three members to the authority, with the terms of members staggered such
that the term ofone member [each expiring on December 31, 1992, December 31, 1994, and
December 31, 1996] expires on December thirty-first of each even-numbered year;

HB 2258 5
(2) As the term of each initial member expires, new members shall be elected from
each county. Each elected member shall serve a six-year term and until [his] the member's
successor is duly elected and qualified.
2. A person, to be qualified to serve as a member, shall be a voter of the state for more
than five years prior to [his] the member's election or appointment, shall be a resident in the
county which [he] the member will represent for more than five years and shall be over the
age of twenty-five years. If any member moves outside the county from which [he] the
member was appointed or elected, [his] the member's seat shall be deemed vacant and a
new member shall be appointed by the county commission of such county to complete [his]
the unexpired term.
3. A person desiring to become a candidate for the authority shall pay the sum of five
dollars as a filing fee to the treasurer of the county in which [he] the personresides, and shall
file with the election authority a statement under oath that [he] the personpossesses all of the
qualifications set out in sections 67.781 to 67.790 for a member of the authority. Thereafter,
[he] such person shall have [his] such person's name placed on the ballot as a candidate.
4. If six or more persons from [the second class] a county described under
subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section 67.782 file as candidates, a primary election shall
be held in August, and the four candidates who receive the most votes shall be candidates at
the general election. If two or more candidates receive an equal number of votes, and if that
number of votes would otherwise qualify each tied candidate for a position on the general
election ballot, all such tied candidates shall be included on the general election ballot. The
two candidates [from the second class county] receiving the most votes in the general election
shall be declared the winners.
5. If four or more persons from [the third class] a county described under
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 67.782 file as candidates, a primary election shall
be held in August, and the two candidates who receive the most votes shall be candidates at
the general election. If two or more candidates receive an equal number of votes, and if that
number of votes would otherwise qualify each tied candidate for a position on the general
election ballot, all such tied candidates shall be included on the general election ballot. The
candidate [from the second class county] receiving the most votes in the general election shall
be declared the winner.
144.030. 1. There is hereby specifically exempted from the provisions of sections
144.010 to 144.525 and from the computation of the tax levied, assessed or payable pursuant
to sections 144.010 to 144.525 such retail sales as may be made in commerce between this
state and any other state of the United States, or between this state and any foreign country,
and any retail sale which the state of Missouri is prohibited from taxing pursuant to the
Constitution or laws of the United States of America, and such retail sales of tangible

HB 2258 6
personal property which the general assembly of the state of Missouri is prohibited from
taxing or further taxing by the constitution of this state.
2. There are also specifically exempted from the provisions of the local sales tax law
as defined in section 32.085, section 238.235, and sections 144.010 to 144.525 and 144.600 to
144.761 and from the computation of the tax levied, assessed or payable pursuant to the local
sales tax law as defined in section 32.085, section 238.235, and sections 144.010 to 144.525
and 144.600 to 144.745:
(1) Motor fuel or special fuel subject to an excise tax of this state, unless all or part of
such excise tax is refunded pursuant to section 142.824; or upon the sale at retail of fuel to be
consumed in manufacturing or creating gas, power, steam, electrical current or in furnishing
water to be sold ultimately at retail; or feed for livestock or poultry; or grain to be converted
into foodstuffs which are to be sold ultimately in processed form at retail; or seed, limestone
or fertilizer which is to be used for seeding, liming or fertilizing crops which when harvested
will be sold at retail or will be fed to livestock or poultry to be sold ultimately in processed
form at retail; economic poisons registered pursuant to the provisions of the Missouri
pesticide registration law, sections 281.220 to 281.310, which are to be used in connection
with the growth or production of crops, fruit trees or orchards applied before, during, or after
planting, the crop of which when harvested will be sold at retail or will be converted into
foodstuffs which are to be sold ultimately in processed form at retail;
(2) Materials, manufactured goods, machinery and parts which when used in
manufacturing, processing, compounding, mining, producing or fabricating become a
component part or ingredient of the new personal property resulting from such
manufacturing, processing, compounding, mining, producing or fabricating and which new
personal property is intended to be sold ultimately for final use or consumption; and
materials, including without limitation, gases and manufactured goods, including without
limitation slagging materials and firebrick, which are ultimately consumed in the
manufacturing process by blending, reacting or interacting with or by becoming, in whole
or in part, component parts or ingredients of steel products intended to be sold ultimately for
final use or consumption;
(3) Materials, replacement parts and equipment purchased for use directly upon, and
for the repair and maintenance or manufacture of, motor vehicles, watercraft, railroad rolling
stock or aircraft engaged as common carriers of persons or property;
(4) Replacement machinery, equipment, and parts and the materials and supplies
solely required for the installation or construction of such replacement machinery, equipment,
and parts, used directly in manufacturing, mining, fabricating or producing a product which is
intended to be sold ultimately for final use or consumption; and machinery and equipment,
and the materials and supplies required solely for the operation, installation or construction of

HB 2258 7
such machinery and equipment, purchased and used to establish new, or to replace or expand
existing, material recovery processing plants in this state. For the purposes of this
subdivision, a "material recovery processing plant" means a facility that has as its primary
purpose the recovery of materials into a usable product or a different form which is used in
producing a new product and shall include a facility or equipment which are used exclusively
for the collection of recovered materials for delivery to a material recovery processing plant
but shall not include motor vehicles used on highways. For purposes of this section, the terms
motor vehicle and highway shall have the same meaning pursuant to section 301.010. For the
purposes of this subdivision, subdivision (5) of this subsection, and section 144.054, as well
as the definition in subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of section 144.010, the term "product"
includes telecommunications services and the term "manufacturing" shall include the
production, or production and transmission, of telecommunications services. The preceding
sentence does not make a substantive change in the law and is intended to clarify that the term
"manufacturing" has included and continues to include the production and transmission of
"telecommunications services", as enacted in this subdivision and subdivision (5) of this
subsection, as well as the definition in subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of section 144.010.
The preceding two sentences reaffirm legislative intent consistent with the interpretation of
this subdivision and subdivision (5) of this subsection in Southwestern Bell Tel. Co. v.
Director of Revenue, 78 S.W.3d 763 (Mo. banc 2002) and Southwestern Bell Tel. Co. v.
Director of Revenue, 182 S.W.3d 226 (Mo. banc 2005), and accordingly abrogates the
Missouri supreme court's interpretation of those exemptions in IBM Corporation v. Director
of Revenue, 491 S.W.3d 535 (Mo. banc 2016) to the extent inconsistent with this section and
Southwestern Bell Tel. Co. v. Director of Revenue, 78 S.W.3d 763 (Mo. banc 2002) and
Southwestern Bell Tel. Co. v. Director of Revenue, 182 S.W.3d 226 (Mo. banc 2005). The
construction and application of this subdivision as expressed by the Missouri supreme court
in DST Systems, Inc. v. Director of Revenue, 43 S.W.3d 799 (Mo. banc 2001); Southwestern
Bell Tel. Co. v. Director of Revenue, 78 S.W.3d 763 (Mo. banc 2002); and Southwestern Bell
Tel. Co. v. Director of Revenue, 182 S.W.3d 226 (Mo. banc 2005), is hereby affirmed.
Material recovery is not the reuse of materials within a manufacturing process or the use of a
product previously recovered. The material recovery processing plant shall qualify under the
provisions of this section regardless of ownership of the material being recovered;
(5) Machinery and equipment, and parts and the materials and supplies solely
required for the installation or construction of such machinery and equipment, purchased and
used to establish new or to expand existing manufacturing, mining or fabricating plants in the
state if such machinery and equipment is used directly in manufacturing, mining or
fabricating a product which is intended to be sold ultimately for final use or consumption.
The construction and application of this subdivision as expressed by the Missouri supreme

HB 2258 8
court in DST Systems, Inc. v. Director of Revenue, 43 S.W.3d 799 (Mo. banc 2001);
Southwestern Bell Tel. Co. v. Director of Revenue, 78 S.W.3d 763 (Mo. banc 2002); and
Southwestern Bell Tel. Co. v. Director of Revenue, 182 S.W.3d 226 (Mo. banc 2005), is
hereby affirmed;
(6) Tangible personal property which is used exclusively in the manufacturing,
processing, modification or assembling of products sold to the United States government or to
any agency of the United States government;
(7) Animals or poultry used for breeding or feeding purposes, or captive wildlife;
(8) Newsprint, ink, computers, photosensitive paper and film, toner, printing plates
and other machinery, equipment, replacement parts and supplies used in producing
newspapers published for dissemination of news to the general public;
(9) The rentals of films, records or any type of sound or picture transcriptions for
public commercial display;
(10) Pumping machinery and equipment used to propel products delivered by
pipelines engaged as common carriers;
(11) Railroad rolling stock for use in transporting persons or property in interstate
commerce and motor vehicles licensed for a gross weight of twenty-four thousand pounds or
more or trailers used by common carriers, as defined in section 390.020, in the transportation
of persons or property;
100 (12) Electrical energy used in the actual primary manufacture, processing,
101 compounding, mining or producing of a product, or electrical energy used in the actual
102 secondary processing or fabricating of the product, or a material recovery processing plant as
103 defined in subdivision (4) of this subsection, in facilities owned or leased by the taxpayer, if
104 the total cost of electrical energy so used exceeds ten percent of the total cost of production,
105 either primary or secondary, exclusive of the cost of electrical energy so used or if the raw
106 materials used in such processing contain at least twenty-five percent recovered materials as
107 defined in section 260.200. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the raw materials
108 used in the primary manufacture of automobiles contain at least twenty-five percent
109 recovered materials. For purposes of this subdivision, "processing" means any mode of
110 treatment, act or series of acts performed upon materials to transform and reduce them to a
111 different state or thing, including treatment necessary to maintain or preserve such processing
112 by the producer at the production facility;
113 (13) Anodes which are used or consumed in manufacturing, processing,
114 compounding, mining, producing or fabricating and which have a useful life of less than
115 one year;
116 (14) Machinery, equipment, appliances and devices purchased or leased and used
117 solely for the purpose of preventing, abating or monitoring air pollution, and materials and

HB 2258 9
118 supplies solely required for the installation, construction or reconstruction of such machinery,
119 equipment, appliances and devices;
120 (15) Machinery, equipment, appliances and devices purchased or leased and used
121 solely for the purpose of preventing, abating or monitoring water pollution, and materials and
122 supplies solely required for the installation, construction or reconstruction of such machinery,
123 equipment, appliances and devices;
124 (16) Tangible personal property purchased by a rural water district;
125 (17) All amounts paid or charged for admission or participation or other fees paid by
126 or other charges to individuals in or for any place of amusement, entertainment or recreation,
127 games or athletic events, including museums, fairs, zoos and planetariums, owned or operated
128 by a municipality or other political subdivision where all the proceeds derived therefrom
129 benefit the municipality or other political subdivision and do not inure to any private person,
130 firm, or corporation, provided, however, that a municipality or other political subdivision may
131 enter into revenue-sharing agreements with private persons, firms, or corporations providing
132 goods or services, including management services, in or for the place of amusement,
133 entertainment or recreation, games or athletic events, and provided further that nothing in this
134 subdivision shall exempt from tax any amounts retained by any private person, firm, or
135 corporation under such revenue-sharing agreement;
136 (18) All sales of insulin, and all sales, rentals, repairs, and parts of durable medical
137 equipment, prosthetic devices, and orthopedic devices as defined [on January 1, 1980,] by the
138 federal Medicare program pursuant to Title XVIII of the Social Security Act of 1965, as
139 amended, including the items specified in Section 1862(a)(12) of that act, and also
140 specifically including hearing aids and hearing aid supplies and all sales of drugs which may
141 be legally dispensed by a licensed pharmacist only upon a lawful prescription of a practitioner
142 licensed to administer those items, including samples and materials used to manufacture
143 samples which may be dispensed by a practitioner authorized to dispense such samples and
144 all sales or rental of medical oxygen, home respiratory equipment and accessories including
145 parts, and hospital beds and accessories and ambulatory aids including parts, and all sales or
146 rental of manual and powered wheelchairs including parts and accessories, and stairway lifts,
147 Braille writers, electronic Braille equipment and, if purchased or rented by or on behalf of a
148 person with one or more physical or mental disabilities to enable them to function more
149 independently, all sales or rental of scooters including parts, and reading machines, electronic
150 print enlargers and magnifiers, electronic alternative and augmentative communication
151 devices, and items used solely to modify motor vehicles to permit the use of such motor
152 vehicles by individuals with disabilities or sales of over-the-counter or nonprescription drugs
153 to individuals with disabilities, and drugs required by the Food and Drug Administration to

HB 2258 10
154 meet the over-the-counter drug product labeling requirements in 21 CFR 201.66, or its
155 successor, as prescribed by a health care practitioner licensed to prescribe;
156 (19) All sales made by or to religious and charitable organizations and institutions in
157 their religious, charitable or educational functions and activities and all sales made by or to all
158 elementary and secondary schools operated at public expense in their educational functions
159 and activities;
160 (20) All sales of aircraft to common carriers for storage or for use in interstate
161 commerce and all sales made by or to not-for-profit civic, social, service or fraternal
162 organizations, including fraternal organizations which have been declared tax-exempt
163 organizations pursuant to Section 501(c)(8) or (10) of the 1986 Internal Revenue Code, as
164 amended, in their civic or charitable functions and activities and all sales made to
165 eleemosynary and penal institutions and industries of the state, and all sales made to any
166 private not-for-profit institution of higher education not otherwise excluded pursuant to
167 subdivision (19) of this subsection or any institution of higher education supported by public
168 funds, and all sales made to a state relief agency in the exercise of relief functions and
169 activities;
170 (21) All ticket sales made by benevolent, scientific and educational associations
171 which are formed to foster, encourage, and promote progress and improvement in the science
172 of agriculture and in the raising and breeding of animals, and by nonprofit summer theater
173 organizations if such organizations are exempt from federal tax pursuant to the provisions of
174 the Internal Revenue Code and all admission charges and entry fees to the Missouri state fair
175 or any fair conducted by a county agricultural and mechanical society organized and operated
176 pursuant to sections 262.290 to 262.530;
177 (22) All sales made to any private not-for-profit elementary or secondary school, all
178 sales of feed additives, medications or vaccines administered to livestock or poultry in the
179 production of food or fiber, all sales of pesticides used in the production of crops, livestock or
180 poultry for food or fiber, all sales of bedding used in the production of livestock or poultry for
181 food or fiber, all sales of propane or natural gas, electricity or diesel fuel used exclusively for
182 drying agricultural crops, natural gas used in the primary manufacture or processing of fuel
183 ethanol as defined in section 142.028, natural gas, propane, and electricity used by an eligible
184 new generation cooperative or an eligible new generation processing entity as defined in
185 section 348.432, and all sales of farm machinery and equipment, other than airplanes, motor
186 vehicles and trailers, and any freight charges on any exempt item. As used in this
187 subdivision, the term "feed additives" means tangible personal property which, when mixed
188 with feed for livestock or poultry, is to be used in the feeding of livestock or poultry. As used
189 in this subdivision, the term "pesticides" includes adjuvants such as crop oils, surfactants,
190 wetting agents and other assorted pesticide carriers used to improve or enhance the effect of a

HB 2258 11
191 pesticide and the foam used to mark the application of pesticides and herbicides for the
192 production of crops, livestock or poultry. As used in this subdivision, the term "farm
193 machinery and equipment" shall mean:
194 (a) New or used farm tractors and such other new or used farm machinery and
195 equipment, including utility vehicles used for any agricultural use, and repair or replacement
196 parts thereon and any accessories for and upgrades to such farm machinery and equipment
197 and rotary mowers used for any agricultural purposes. For the purposes of this subdivision,
198 "utility vehicle" shall mean any motorized vehicle manufactured and used exclusively for off-
199 highway use which is more than fifty inches but no more than eighty inches in width,
200 measured from outside of tire rim to outside of tire rim, with an unladen dry weight of three
201 thousand five hundred pounds or less, traveling on four or six wheels;
202 (b) Supplies and lubricants used exclusively, solely, and directly for producing crops,
203 raising and feeding livestock, fish, poultry, pheasants, chukar, quail, or for producing milk for
204 ultimate sale at retail, including field drain tile; and
205 (c) One-half of each purchaser's purchase of diesel fuel therefor which is:
206 a. Used exclusively for agricultural purposes;
207 b. Used on land owned or leased for the purpose of producing farm products; and
208 c. Used directly in producing farm products to be sold ultimately in processed form or
209 otherwise at retail or in producing farm products to be fed to livestock or poultry to be sold
210 ultimately in processed form at retail;
211 (23) Except as otherwise provided in section 144.032, all sales of metered water
212 service, electricity, electrical current, natural, artificial or propane gas, wood, coal or home
213 heating oil for domestic use and in any city not within a county, all sales of metered or
214 unmetered water service for domestic use:
215 (a) "Domestic use" means that portion of metered water service, electricity, electrical
216 current, natural, artificial or propane gas, wood, coal or home heating oil, and in any city not
217 within a county, metered or unmetered water service, which an individual occupant of a
218 residential premises uses for nonbusiness, noncommercial or nonindustrial purposes. Utility
219 service through a single or master meter for residential apartments or condominiums,
220 including service for common areas and facilities and vacant units, shall be deemed to be for
221 domestic use. Each seller shall establish and maintain a system whereby individual purchases
222 are determined as exempt or nonexempt;
223 (b) Regulated utility sellers shall determine whether individual purchases are exempt
224 or nonexempt based upon the seller's utility service rate classifications as contained in tariffs
225 on file with and approved by the Missouri public service commission. Sales and purchases
226 made pursuant to the rate classification "residential" and sales to and purchases made by or on
227 behalf of the occupants of residential apartments or condominiums through a single or master

HB 2258 12
228 meter, including service for common areas and facilities and vacant units, shall be considered
229 as sales made for domestic use and such sales shall be exempt from sales tax. Sellers shall
230 charge sales tax upon the entire amount of purchases classified as nondomestic use. The
231 seller's utility service rate classification and the provision of service thereunder shall be
232 conclusive as to whether or not the utility must charge sales tax;
233 (c) Each person making domestic use purchases of services or property and who uses
234 any portion of the services or property so purchased for a nondomestic use shall, by the
235 fifteenth day of the fourth month following the year of purchase, and without assessment,
236 notice or demand, file a return and pay sales tax on that portion of nondomestic purchases.
237 Each person making nondomestic purchases of services or property and who uses any portion
238 of the services or property so purchased for domestic use, and each person making domestic
239 purchases on behalf of occupants of residential apartments or condominiums through a single
240 or master meter, including service for common areas and facilities and vacant units, under a
241 nonresidential utility service rate classification may, between the first day of the first month
242 and the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the year of purchase, apply for credit or
243 refund to the director of revenue and the director shall give credit or make refund for taxes
244 paid on the domestic use portion of the purchase. The person making such purchases on
245 behalf of occupants of residential apartments or condominiums shall have standing to apply to
246 the director of revenue for such credit or refund;
247 (24) All sales of handicraft items made by the seller or the seller's spouse if the seller
248 or the seller's spouse is at least sixty-five years of age, and if the total gross proceeds from
249 such sales do not constitute a majority of the annual gross income of the seller;
250 (25) Excise taxes, collected on sales at retail, imposed by Sections 4041, 4071, 4081,
251 [4091,] 4161, 4181, 4251, 4261 and 4271 of Title 26, United States Code. The director of
252 revenue shall promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 536 to eliminate all state and local sales
253 taxes on such excise taxes;
254 (26) Sales of fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, barges, or waterborne
255 vessels which are used primarily in or for the transportation of property or cargo, or the
256 conveyance of persons for hire, on navigable rivers bordering on or located in part in this
257 state, if such fuel is delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or waterborne vessel
258 while it is afloat upon such river;
259 (27) All sales made to an interstate compact agency created pursuant to sections
260 70.370 to 70.441 or sections 238.010 to 238.100 in the exercise of the functions and activities
261 of such agency as provided pursuant to the compact;
262 (28) Computers, computer software and computer security systems purchased for use
263 by architectural or engineering firms headquartered in this state. For the purposes of this

HB 2258 13
264 subdivision, "headquartered in this state" means the office for the administrative management
265 of at least four integrated facilities operated by the taxpayer is located in the state of Missouri;
266 (29) All livestock sales when either the seller is engaged in the growing, producing or
267 feeding of such livestock, or the seller is engaged in the business of buying and selling,
268 bartering or leasing of such livestock;
269 (30) All sales of barges which are to be used primarily in the transportation of
270 property or cargo on interstate waterways;
271 (31) Electrical energy or gas, whether natural, artificial or propane, water, or other
272 utilities which are ultimately consumed in connection with the manufacturing of cellular glass
273 products or in any material recovery processing plant as defined in subdivision (4) of this
274 subsection;
275 (32) Notwithstanding other provisions of law to the contrary, all sales of pesticides or
276 herbicides used in the production of crops, aquaculture, livestock or poultry;
277 (33) Tangible personal property and utilities purchased for use or consumption
278 directly or exclusively in the research and development of agricultural/biotechnology and
279 plant genomics products and prescription pharmaceuticals consumed by humans or animals;
280 (34) All sales of grain bins for storage of grain for resale;
281 (35) All sales of feed which are developed for and used in the feeding of pets owned
282 by a commercial breeder when such sales are made to a commercial breeder, as defined in
283 section 273.325, and licensed pursuant to sections 273.325 to 273.357;
284 (36) All purchases by a contractor on behalf of an entity located in another state,
285 provided that the entity is authorized to issue a certificate of exemption for purchases to a
286 contractor under the provisions of that state's laws. For purposes of this subdivision, the term
287 "certificate of exemption" shall mean any document evidencing that the entity is exempt from
288 sales and use taxes on purchases pursuant to the laws of the state in which the entity is
289 located. Any contractor making purchases on behalf of such entity shall maintain a copy of
290 the entity's exemption certificate as evidence of the exemption. If the exemption certificate
291 issued by the exempt entity to the contractor is later determined by the director of revenue to
292 be invalid for any reason and the contractor has accepted the certificate in good faith, neither
293 the contractor or the exempt entity shall be liable for the payment of any taxes, interest and
294 penalty due as the result of use of the invalid exemption certificate. Materials shall be exempt
295 from all state and local sales and use taxes when purchased by a contractor for the purpose of
296 fabricating tangible personal property which is used in fulfilling a contract for the purpose of
297 constructing, repairing or remodeling facilities for the following:
298 (a) An exempt entity located in this state, if the entity is one of those entities able to
299 issue project exemption certificates in accordance with the provisions of section 144.062; or

HB 2258 14
300 (b) An exempt entity located outside the state if the exempt entity is authorized to
301 issue an exemption certificate to contractors in accordance with the provisions of that state's
302 law and the applicable provisions of this section;
303 (37) All sales or other transfers of tangible personal property to a lessor who leases
304 the property under a lease of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the sale or
305 other transfer to an interstate compact agency created pursuant to sections 70.370 to 70.441 or
306 sections 238.010 to 238.100;
307 (38) Sales of tickets to any collegiate athletic championship event that is held in a
308 facility owned or operated by a governmental authority or commission, a quasi-governmental
309 agency, a state university or college or by the state or any political subdivision thereof,
310 including a municipality, and that is played on a neutral site and may reasonably be played at
311 a site located outside the state of Missouri. For purposes of this subdivision, "neutral site"
312 means any site that is not located on the campus of a conference member institution
313 participating in the event;
314 (39) All purchases by a sports complex authority created under section 64.920, and all
315 sales of utilities by such authority at the authority's cost that are consumed in connection with
316 the operation of a sports complex leased to a professional sports team;
317 (40) All materials, replacement parts, and equipment purchased for use directly upon,
318 and for the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft, aircraft power
319 plants, and aircraft accessories;
320 (41) Sales of sporting clays, wobble, skeet, and trap targets to any shooting range or
321 similar places of business for use in the normal course of business and money received by a
322 shooting range or similar places of business from patrons and held by a shooting range or
323 similar place of business for redistribution to patrons at the conclusion of a shooting event;
324 (42) All sales of motor fuel, as defined in section 142.800, used in any watercraft, as
325 defined in section 306.010;
326 (43) Any new or used aircraft sold or delivered in this state to a person who is not a
327 resident of this state or a corporation that is not incorporated in this state, and such aircraft is
328 not to be based in this state and shall not remain in this state more than ten business days
329 subsequent to the last to occur of:
330 (a) The transfer of title to the aircraft to a person who is not a resident of this state or a
331 corporation that is not incorporated in this state; or
332 (b) The date of the return to service of the aircraft in accordance with 14 CFR 91.407
333 for any maintenance, preventive maintenance, rebuilding, alterations, repairs, or installations
334 that are completed contemporaneously with the transfer of title to the aircraft to a person who
335 is not a resident of this state or a corporation that is not incorporated in this state;

HB 2258 15
336 (44) Motor vehicles registered in excess of fifty-four thousand pounds, and the
337 trailers pulled by such motor vehicles, that are actually used in the normal course of business
338 to haul property on the public highways of the state, and that are capable of hauling loads
339 commensurate with the motor vehicle's registered weight; and the materials, replacement
340 parts, and equipment purchased for use directly upon, and for the repair and maintenance or
341 manufacture of such vehicles. For purposes of this subdivision, "motor vehicle" and "public
342 highway" shall have the meaning as ascribed in section 390.020;
343 (45) All internet access or the use of internet access regardless of whether the tax is
344 imposed on a provider of internet access or a buyer of internet access. For purposes of this
345 subdivision, the following terms shall mean:
346 (a) "Direct costs", costs incurred by a governmental authority solely because of an
347 internet service provider's use of the public right-of-way. The term shall not include costs that
348 the governmental authority would have incurred if the internet service provider did not make
349 such use of the public right-of-way. Direct costs shall be determined in a manner consistent
350 with generally accepted accounting principles;
351 (b) "Internet", computer and telecommunications facilities, including equipment and
352 operating software, that comprises the interconnected worldwide network that employ the
353 transmission control protocol or internet protocol, or any predecessor or successor protocols
354 to that protocol, to communicate information of all kinds by wire or radio;
355 (c) "Internet access", a service that enables users to connect to the internet to access
356 content, information, or other services without regard to whether the service is referred to as
357 telecommunications, communications, transmission, or similar services, and without regard to
358 whether a provider of the service is subject to regulation by the Federal Communications
359 Commission as a common carrier under 47 U.S.C. Section 201, et seq. For purposes of this
360 subdivision, internet access also includes: the purchase, use, or sale of communications
361 services, including telecommunications services as defined in section 144.010, to the extent
362 the communications services are purchased, used, or sold to provide the service described in
363 this subdivision or to otherwise enable users to access content, information, or other services
364 offered over the internet; services that are incidental to the provision of a service described in
365 this subdivision, when furnished to users as part of such service, including a home page,
366 electronic mail, and instant messaging, including voice-capable and video-capable electronic
367 mail and instant messaging, video clips, and personal electronic storage capacity; a home
368 page electronic mail and instant messaging, including voice-capable and video-capable
369 electronic mail and instant messaging, video clips, and personal electronic storage capacity
370 that are provided independently or that are not packed with internet access. As used in this
371 subdivision, internet access does not include voice, audio, and video programming or other
372 products and services, except services described in this paragraph or this subdivision, that use

HB 2258 16
373 internet protocol or any successor protocol and for which there is a charge, regardless of
374 whether the charge is separately stated or aggregated with the charge for services described in
375 this paragraph or this subdivision;
376 (d) "Tax", any charge imposed by the state or a political subdivision of the state for
377 the purpose of generating revenues for governmental purposes and that is not a fee imposed
378 for a specific privilege, service, or benefit conferred, except as described as otherwise under
379 this subdivision, or any obligation imposed on a seller to collect and to remit to the state or a
380 political subdivision of the state any gross retail tax, sales tax, or use tax imposed on a buyer
381 by such a governmental entity. The term tax shall not include any franchise fee or similar fee
382 imposed or authorized under sections 67.1830 to 67.1846 or section 67.2689; Section 622 or
383 653 of the Communications Act of 1934, 47 U.S.C. Section 542 and 47 U.S.C. Section 573;
384 or any other fee related to obligations of telecommunications carriers under the
385 Communications Act of 1934, 47 U.S.C. Section 151, et seq., except to the extent that:
386 a. The fee is not imposed for the purpose of recovering direct costs incurred by the
387 franchising or other governmental authority from providing the specific privilege, service, or
388 benefit conferred to the payer of the fee; or
389 b. The fee is imposed for the use of a public right-of-way based on a percentage of the
390 service revenue, and the fee exceeds the incremental direct costs incurred by the
391 governmental authority associated with the provision of that right-of-way to the provider
392 of internet access service.
393
394 Nothing in this subdivision shall be interpreted as an exemption from taxes due on goods or
395 services that were subject to tax on January 1, 2016;
396 (46) All purchases by a company of solar photovoltaic energy systems, components
397 used to construct a solar photovoltaic energy system, and all purchases of materials and
398 supplies used directly to construct or make improvements to such systems, provided that such
399 systems:
400 (a) Are sold or leased to an end user; or
401 (b) Are used to produce, collect and transmit electricity for resale or retail;
402 (47) Used tangible personal property purchased at an auction of used tangible
403 personal property. The term "used tangible personal property" means any tangible
404 personal property upon which a sales or use tax has previously been imposed. The term
405 "used tangible personal property" shall not include motor vehicles, trailers, boats, or
406 outboard motors purchased or acquired for use on the highways or waters of this state
407 and required to be titled under the laws of the state of Missouri.
408 3. Any ruling, agreement, or contract, whether written or oral, express or implied,
409 between a person and this state's executive branch, or any other state agency or department,

HB 2258 17
410 stating, agreeing, or ruling that such person is not required to collect sales and use tax in this
411 state despite the presence of a warehouse, distribution center, or fulfillment center in this state
412 that is owned or operated by the person or an affiliated person shall be null and void unless it
413 is specifically approved by a majority vote of each of the houses of the general assembly. For
414 purposes of this subsection, an "affiliated person" means any person that is a member of the
415 same controlled group of corporations as defined in Section 1563(a) of the Internal Revenue
416 Code of 1986, as amended, as the vendor or any other entity that, notwithstanding its form of
417 organization, bears the same ownership relationship to the vendor as a corporation that is a
418 member of the same controlled group of corporations as defined in Section 1563(a) of the
419 Internal Revenue Code, as amended.
144.615. There are specifically exempted from the taxes levied in sections 144.600 to
144.745:
(1) Property, the storage, use or consumption of which this state is prohibited from
taxing pursuant to the constitution or laws of the United States or of this state;
(2) Property, the gross receipts from the sale of which are required to be included in
the measure of the tax imposed pursuant to the Missouri sales tax law;
(3) Tangible personal property, the sale or other transfer of which, if made in this
state, would be exempt from or not subject to the Missouri sales tax pursuant to the provisions
of subsection 2 of section 144.030;
(4) Motor vehicles, trailers, boats, and outboard motors subject to the tax imposed by
section 144.020;
(5) Tangible personal property which has been subjected to a tax by any other state in
this respect to its sales or use; provided, if such tax is less than the tax imposed by sections
144.600 to 144.745, such property, if otherwise taxable, shall be subject to a tax equal to the
difference between such tax and the tax imposed by sections 144.600 to 144.745;
(6) Tangible personal property held by processors, retailers, importers, manufacturers,
wholesalers, or jobbers solely for resale in the regular course of business;
(7) Personal and household effects and farm machinery used while an individual was
a bona fide resident of another state and who thereafter became a resident of this state, or
tangible personal property brought into the state by a nonresident for his own storage, use or
consumption while temporarily within the state;
(8) Used tangible personal property purchased at an auction of used tangible
personal property. The term "used tangible personal property" means any tangible
personal property upon which a sales or use tax has previously been imposed. The term
"used tangible personal property" shall not include motor vehicles, trailers, boats, or
outboard motors purchased or acquired for use on the highways or waters of this state
and required to be titled under the laws of the state of Missouri.

HB 2258 18
313.057. 1. It is unlawful for any person, either as an owner, lessee or employee, to
operate, carry on, conduct or maintain any form of manufacturing, selling, leasing or
distribution of any bingo equipment or supplies without having first procured and maintained
a Missouri bingo equipment and supplies manufacturer or supplier license.
2. The commission shall submit two sets of fingerprints for each key person, as
defined in commission rules and regulations, of an entity or organization seeking issuance or
renewal of a Missouri bingo equipment and supplies manufacturer or supplier license, for the
purpose of checking the person's prior criminal history when the commission determines a
nationwide check is warranted. The fingerprint cards and any required fees shall be sent to
the Missouri state highway patrol's criminal records division. The first set of fingerprints
shall be used for searching the state repository of criminal history information. The second
set of fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Identification
Division, for the searching of the federal criminal history files. The patrol shall notify the
commission of any criminal history information or lack of criminal history information
discovered on the individual. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.120, all records
related to any criminal history information discovered shall be accessible and available to the
commission.
3. The holder of a state bingo license may, within two years of cessation of
conducting bingo or upon specific approval by the commission, dispose of by sale in a
manner approved by the commission, any or all of his bingo equipment and supplies, without
a supplier's license. In case of foreclosure of a lien by a bank or other person holding a
security interest for which bingo equipment is security in whole or in part for the lien, the
commission may authorize the disposition of the bingo equipment without requiring a
supplier's license.
4. Any person whom the commission determines to be a suitable person to receive a
license pursuant to the provisions of this section may be issued a manufacturer's or supplier's
license. The commission may require suppliers to post a bond with the commission in an
amount and in the manner prescribed by the commission. The burden of proving his
qualification to receive or hold a license pursuant to this section is at all times on the applicant
or licensee.
5. The commission shall charge and collect from each applicant for a supplier's
license a one-time application fee set by the commission, not to exceed five thousand dollars.
The commission shall charge and collect an annual renewal fee for each supplier licensee not
to exceed one thousand dollars. The applicant shall be responsible for the total cost of the
criminal history investigation. If the cost of the investigation exceeds the total amount of fees
filed by the applicant in this subsection, the commission may assess additional fees as it
deems appropriate.

HB 2258 19
6. The commission shall charge and collect from each applicant for a manufacturer's
license a one-time application fee set by the commission, not to exceed five thousand dollars.
The commission shall charge and collect an annual renewal fee for each manufacturer
licensee not to exceed one thousand dollars. The applicant shall be responsible for the total
cost of the criminal history investigation. If the cost of the investigation exceeds the total
amount of fees filed by the applicant in this subsection, the commission may assess additional
fees as it deems appropriate.
7. The commission shall charge and collect from each applicant for a hall provider's
license a one-time application fee set by the commission, not to exceed seven hundred fifty
dollars. The commission shall charge and collect an annual renewal fee for each hall provider
licensee not to exceed five hundred dollars.
8. All licenses issued pursuant to this section shall be issued for the calendar year and
shall expire on December thirty-first of each year. Regardless of the date of application or
issuance of the license, the fee to be charged and collected pursuant to this section shall be the
full annual fee.
9. All license fees collected pursuant to this section shall be paid over immediately to
the state treasurer to be deposited to the credit of the gaming commission fund.
10. All licensees pursuant to this section shall maintain for a period of not less than
three years full and complete records of all business carried on in this state and shall make
same available for inspection to any duly authorized representative of the commission. If a
supplier does not receive payment in full from an organization within thirty days of the
delivery of bingo supplies, the supplier shall notify the commission in writing, or in a manner
specified by the commission in its rules and regulations, of the delinquency. Upon receipt of
the notice of delinquency, the commission shall notify all suppliers that until further notice
from the commission, all sales of bingo supplies to the delinquent organizations shall be on a
cash-only basis. Upon receipt of the notice from the commission, no supplier may extend
credit to the delinquent organization until such time as the commission approves credit sales.
If a manufacturer does not receive payment in full from a supplier within ninety days of the
delivery of bingo supplies, the manufacturer shall notify the commission in writing, or in a
manner specified by the commission in its rules and regulations, of the delinquency. Upon
receipt of the notice of delinquency, the commission shall notify all manufacturers that until
further notice from the commission, all sales of bingo supplies to the delinquent supplier shall
be on a cash-only basis. Upon receipt of the notice from the commission, no manufacturer
may extend credit to the delinquent supplier until such time as the commission approves
credit sales.
11. [Until January 1, 1995, all suppliers shall pay a tax on all pull-tab cards
distributed by them in the amount of ten dollars per box when sold by any organization

HB 2258 20
licensed to conduct bingo pursuant to the provisions of sections 313.005 to 313.080. No box
sold shall contain more than twenty-four hundred pull-tab cards. Beginning January 1, 1995,
a tax is hereby imposed in the amount of two percent of the gross receipts of the retail sales
value charged for each pull-tab card sold in Missouri to be paid by the supplier. The taxes,
less two percent of the total amount paid which may be retained by the supplier, if timely filed
and paid, shall be paid on a monthly basis to the commission by each supplier of pull-tabs and
shall be due on the last day of each month following the month in which the pull-tabs were
sold. The taxes shall be deposited in the state treasury, credited to the bingo proceeds for
education fund.] All pull-tab cards sold by suppliers in this state shall bear on the face thereof
the amount for which such pull-tab cards will be sold. Each unit container shall contain cards
printed in such a manner as to ensure that at least sixty percent of the gross revenues
generated by the ultimate sale of such cards shall be returned to the final purchasers of such
cards. [Any supplier who fails to pay the tax imposed pursuant to this subsection shall have
his license issued pursuant to this section revoked and shall be guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.]
[313.055. 1. A tax is hereby imposed on each organization conducting
the game of bingo which awards to winners of bingo games prizes or
merchandise having an aggregate retail value of more than five thousand
dollars annually and more than one hundred dollars in any single day. The tax
shall be in the amount of two-tenths of one cent upon each bingo card and
progressive bingo game card sold in Missouri to be paid by the supplier. The
taxes, less two percent of the total amount paid which may be retained by the
supplier, shall be paid on a monthly basis to the commission, by each supplier
of bingo supplies and shall be due on the last day of the month following the
month in which the bingo card was sold, with the date of sale being the date on
the invoice evidencing the sale, along with such reports as may be required by
the commission. The taxes shall be deposited in the state treasury, credited to
the bingo proceeds for education fund.
2. All taxes not paid to the commission by the person or licensee
required to remit the same on the date when the same becomes due and
payable to the commission under the provisions of sections 313.005 to
313.085 shall bear interest at the rate to be set by the commission not to exceed
two percent per calendar month, or fraction thereof, from and after such date
until paid. In addition, the commission may impose a penalty not to exceed
three times the amount of taxes due for failure to submit the reports required
by this section and pay the taxes due.]
✔